District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.54

Capitol Hill BID.

(a)

The formation of the Capitol Hill BID, which shall include all taxable property within the geographic areas set forth in subsection (b) of this section, is hereby authorized and the BID taxes established in subsection (c) of this section are hereby imposed through the earlier of the expiration date of this subchapter [May 29, 2016] or the termination or dissolution of the BID.

(b)

The Capitol Hill BID shall be comprised of the following areas:

(1)

The geographic area bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the center line of 3rd Street, N.W., and Constitution Avenue, N.W.; continuing east along the center line of Constitution Avenue, N.W., to the center line of Louisiana Avenue, N.W.; continuing northeast along the center line of Louisiana Avenue, N.W., to the center line of North Capitol Street; continuing north along the center line of North Capitol Street to the center line of Massachusetts Avenue; continuing southeast along the center line of Massachusetts Avenue, N.E., to the eastern edge of the sidewalk of 1st Street, N.E.; continuing north along the eastern edge of the sidewalk of 1st Street, N.E., to the center line of H Street, N.E.; continuing east on the center line of H Street, N.E., to the center line between 2nd Street, N.E., and 3rd Street, N.E.; continuing south along the center line between 2nd Street, N.E., and 3rd Street, N.E., to the center line between D Street, N.E., and E Street, N.E. (deviating, if necessary, so as to include alley properties and the Capitol Courts complex); continuing east along the center line between D Street, N.E., and E Street, N.E., to the center line of 4th Street, N.E.; continuing south along the center line of 4th Street, N.E., to the center line of D Street, N.E.; continuing east along the center line of D Street, N.E., to the center line between 6th Street, N.E., and 7th Street, N.E.; continuing south along the center line between 6th Street, N.E., and 7th Street, N.E., to the center line between C Street, N.E., and Constitution Avenue, N.E.; continuing west along the center line between C Street, N.E., and Constitution Avenue, N.E., to the center line between 3rd Street, N.E., and 4th Street, N.E. (having moved south along the center line of 6th Street, N.E., and north along the center line of 4th Street, N.E., so as to remain along the center line between C Street, N.E., and Constitution Avenue, N.E.); continuing south along the center line between 3rd Street, N.E., and 4th Street, N.E., to the center line between A Street, N.E., and East Capitol Street; continuing east along the center line between A Street, N.E., and East Capitol Street, to the center line between 5th Street, N.E., and 6th Street, N.E.; continuing south along the center line between 5th Street, N.E., and 6th Street, N.E., to the center line of East Capitol Street; continuing south along the center line between 5th Street, S.E., and 6th Street, S.E., to the center line between A Street, S.E., and East Capitol Street; continuing west along the center line between A Street, S.E., and East Capitol Street, to the center line between 3rd Street, S.E., and 4th Street, S.E.; continuing south along the center line between 3rd Street, S.E., and 4th Street, S.E., to the center line of Independence Avenue, S.E.; continuing east along the center line of Independence Avenue, S.E. to the center line of 4th Street, S.E.; continuing south along the center line of 4th Street, S.E., to the center line of North Carolina Avenue, S.E.; continuing southwest along the center line of North Carolina Avenue, S.E., to the center line of 3rd Street, S.E. (that point being the intersection of 3rd Street, S.E., and D Street, S.E.); continuing west along the center line of D Street, S.E., to the center line of 2nd Street, S.E.; continuing south along the center line of 2nd Street, S.E., to the center line of North Carolina Avenue, S.E.; continuing southwest along the center line of North Carolina Avenue, S.E., to the center line of E Street, S.E.; continuing west along the center line of E Street, S.E., to the center line of Canal Street, S.E.; continuing northwest along the center line of Canal Street, S.E., to the center line of South Capitol Street; continuing northwest along the center line of Washington Avenue, S.W. (the continuation of Canal Street) to the center line of Independence Avenue, S.W.; continuing west along the center line of Independence Avenue, S.W., to the center line of 3rd Street, S.W.; continuing north along the center line of 3rd Street, S.W., and then along the center line of 3rd Street, N.W., to the center line of Constitution Avenue, N.W. (the beginning point);

(2)

(A)

Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., from the center line of 4th Street, S.E., to the center line of 17th Street, S.E. (Barney Circle); and

(B)

The lots abutting the section of Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., set forth in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

(3)

(A)

D Street, S.E., from the center line of 7th Street, S.E., to the center line of 9th Street, S.E., and the lots abutting that section of D Street, S.E.; and

(B)

The lots abutting the section of D Street, S.E., set forth in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

(4)

(A)

E Street, S.E., from the center line of 10th Street, S.E., to the center line of 12th Street, N.E.; and

(B)

The lots abutting the section of E Street, S.E., set forth in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

(5)

(A)

G Street, S.E., from the center line of 13th Street, S.E., to the center line of 14th Street, S.E.; and

(B)

The lots abutting the section of G Street, S.E., set forth in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

(6)

(A)

The portion of Potomac Avenue, S.E., north of its center line, from the center line of 13th Street, S.E., to the northern intersection of 13th Street, S.E., with the center line of Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E.; and

(B)

The lots abutting the northern section of Potomac Avenue, S.E., set forth in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

(7)

The geographic area bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the center line of 6th Street, S.E., and the center line of Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E.; continuing north along the center line of 6th Street, S.E., to the center line of North Carolina Avenue, S.E.; continuing northeast along the center line of North Carolina Avenue, S.E., to the center line of 7th Street, S.E.; continuing north along the center line of 7th Street, S.E., to the center line between Independence Avenue, S.E., and A Street, S.E.; continuing east along the center line between Independence Avenue, S.E., and A Street, S.E., to the center line between 7th Street, N.E., and 8th Street, N.E.; continuing south along the center line between 7th Street, N.E., and 8th Street, N.E., to the center line of Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E.; continuing northwest along the center line of Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., to the center line of 6th Street, S.E. (the beginning point); and

(8)

The geographic area bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the center line of 7th Street, S.E., and the center line of Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E.; continuing south along the center line of 7th Street, N.E., to the center line of I Street, S.E.; continuing east along the center line of I Street, S.E., to the center line between 8th Street, S.E., and 9th Street, S.E.; continuing north along the center line between 8th Street, S.E., and 9th Street, S.E., to the center line between E Street, S.E., and G Street, S.E.; continuing east along the center line between E Street, S.E., and G Street, S.E., to the center line between 10th Street, S.E., and 11th Street, S.E.; continuing south along the center line between 10th Street, S. E., and 11th Street, S.E., to the northern border of the Southeast/Southwest Freeway; continuing east along the northern border of the Southeast/Southwest Freeway to the center line of 11th Street, S.E.; continuing north along the center line of 11th Street, S.E., to the center line of K Street, S.E.; continuing east along the center line of K Street, S.E., to the center line between 11th Street, S.E., and 12th Street, S.E.; continuing north along the center line between 11th Street, S.E., and 12th Street, S.E., to the center line of I Street, S.E.; continuing east along the center line of I Street, S.E., to the center line of 12th Street, S.E.; continuing north along the center line of 12th Street, S.E., to the center line of G Street, S.E.; continuing east along the center line of G Street, S.E., to the center line between 12th Street, S.E., and 13th Street, S.E.; continuing north along the center line between 12th Street, S.E., and 13th Street, S.E., to the center line of Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E.; continuing northwest along the center line of Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., to the center line of 7th Street, S.E. (the beginning point).

(c)

(1)

The BID taxes for properties in the Capitol Hill BID shall be:

(A)

Fifteen cents per $100 of 90% of the assessed value of all taxable properties for which the District provides an integrated assessment of both the commercial and residential components; and

(B)

Fifteen cents per $100 of 100% of the assessed value of all taxable properties for which the District does not provide an integrated assessment of the commercial and residential components.

(2)

Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the total BID tax due for tax year 2013 on a single tax lot or a group of functionally integrated contiguous tax lots under common ownership in the Capitol Hill BID shall not exceed $75,000, with the amount to be allocated among the lots in proportion to their assessed values as determined by the Office of Tax and Revenue.

(3)

Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the total BID tax due for tax years 2014 and thereafter on a single tax lot or a group of functionally integrated contiguous tax lots under common ownership in the Capitol Hill BID shall not exceed $125,000 in any tax year, with the amount to be allocated among the lots in proportion to their assessed values as determined by the Office of Tax and Revenue.

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 204
as added Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-257, § 2(d), 52 DCR 1161
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 140(c), 52 DCR 10637
Oct. 17, 2013, D.C. Law 20-33, § 2, 60 DCR 11781
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-161, § 2(s), 61 DCR 10741
D.C. Law 16-91 made a technical change in the enacting clause of D.C. Law 15-257 which resulted in no change in text.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-33 rewrote (c)(2), which read: “Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the total BID tax due on a property or distinct assembly of properties (if the property occupies more than one taxable lot) in the Capitol Hill BID shall not exceed $75,000.00 in any year”; and added (c)(3).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-161 substituted “taxable” for “nonexempt real” in (a); and substituted “taxable” for “nonexempt” twice in (c)(1).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Capitol Hill Business Improvement District Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-144, July 31, 2013, 60 DCR 11803, 20 DCSTAT 1994).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(s) of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-435, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10717, 20 STAT 4154).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(s) of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-582, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1269, 21 STAT 735).